Utah statutes.
17-30-20.   Appeal to district court -- Scope of review.
A person aggrieved by an act or failure to act of any merit system commission
under this act may appeal to the district court, if he has exhausted his
remedies of appeal to the commission. The courts may review questions of law
and fact and may affirm, set aside, or modify the ruling complained of.
